Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,275
Diversion of utility services; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 25-21,275 to 25-21,278, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Bypassing means the act of attaching, connecting, or in any manner affixing any wire, cord, socket, motor, pipe, or other instrument, device, or contrivance to the utility supply system or any part of the system in such a manner as to transmit, supply, or use any utility service without passing through an authorized meter or other device provided for measuring, registering, determining, or limiting the amount of electricity, gas, or water consumed. Bypassing also means the act of employing any means to obtain the use or benefit of electricity, gas, or water without paying for the use at the rate established by the supplier of such utilities;

(2) Customer means the person responsible for payment for utility services for the premises and includes employees and agents of the customer;

(3) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, and other legal entity;

(4) Tampering means the act of damaging, altering, adjusting, or in any manner interfering with or obstructing the action or operation of any meter or other device provided for measuring, registering, determining, or limiting the amount of electricity, gas, or water consumed;

(5) Unauthorized metering means the act of removing, moving, installing, connecting, reconnecting, or disconnecting any meter or metering device for utility service by a person other than an authorized employee or agent of such utility;

(6) Utility means any person or entity lawfully operating in whole or in part for the purpose of supplying electricity, gas, water, including steam, or any combination thereof, to the public or to any person;

(7) Utility service means the provision of electricity, gas, steam, water, or any other service or commodity furnished by the utility for compensation; and

(8) Utility supply system means and includes all wires, conduits, pipes, cords, sockets, motors, meters, instruments, load control equipment, and other devices used by the utility for the purpose of providing utility services.

Laws 1983, LB 350, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 551;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-331.01;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 421.